California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(5) “Fedwire” means any transaction originated by the holder and utilizing the national electronic payment system to transfer funds through federal reserve banks, pursuant to which the holder debits its own bank account and credits the state’s bank account.

(6) “International funds transfer” means any transaction originated by the holder and utilizing the international electronic payment system to transfer funds, pursuant to which the holder debits its own bank account, and credits the funds to a United States bank that credits the Unclaimed Property Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 660, Sec. 5.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1532.1.

Notwithstanding Sections 1531 and 1532, property that escheats to the state pursuant to Section 1514 shall not be paid or delivered to the state until the earlier of (a) the time when the holder is requested to do so by the Controller or (b) within one year after the final date for filing the report required by Section 1530 as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 1530. Within one year after receipt of property as provided by this section, the Controller shall cause a notice to be published as provided in Section 1531.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 762, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1533.

Tangible personal property may be excluded from the notices required by Section 1531, shall not be delivered to the Controller, and shall not escheat to the state, if the Controller, in their discretion, determines that it is not in the interest of the state to take custody of the property and notifies the holder in writing, within 120 days from receipt of the report required by Section 1530, of their determination not to take custody of the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 660, Sec. 6.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Payment of Claims [1540. - 1543.]

1540.

(a) Any person, excluding another state, who claims to have been the owner, as defined in subdivision (d), of property paid or delivered to the Controller under this chapter may file a claim to the property or to the net proceeds from its sale. The claim shall be on a form prescribed by the Controller and shall be verified by the claimant.

(b) The Controller shall consider each claim within 180 days after it is filed to determine if the claimant is the owner, as defined in subdivision (d), and may hold a hearing and receive evidence. The Controller shall give written notice to the claimant if the Controller denies the claim in whole or in part. The notice may be given by mailing it to
 the address, if any, stated in the claim as the address to which notices are to be sent. If no address is stated in the claim, the notice may be mailed to the address, if any, of the claimant as stated in the claim. A notice of denial need not be given if the claim fails to state either an address to which notices are to be sent or an address of the claimant.

(c) Interest shall not be payable on any claim paid under this chapter.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (g) of Section 1501, for purposes of filing a claim pursuant to this section, “owner” means the person who had legal right to the property before its escheat, the person’s heirs or estate representative, the person’s guardian or conservator, or a public administrator acting pursuant to the authority granted in Sections
 7660 and 7661 of the Probate Code. An “owner” also means a nonprofit civic, charitable, or educational organization that granted a charter, sponsorship, or approval for the existence of the organization that had the legal right to the property before its escheat but that has dissolved or is no longer in existence, if the charter, sponsorship, approval, organization bylaws, or other governing documents provide that unclaimed or surplus property shall be conveyed to the granting organization upon dissolution or cessation to exist as a distinct legal entity. Only an owner, as defined in this subdivision, may file a claim with the Controller pursuant to this article.

(e) Following a public hearing, the Controller shall adopt guidelines and forms that shall provide specific instructions to assist owners in filing claims pursuant to this
 article.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision, property reported to, and received by, the Controller pursuant to this chapter in the name of a state agency, including the University of California and the California State University, or a local agency, including a school district and community college district, may be transferred by the Controller directly to the state or local agency without the filing of a claim. Property transferred pursuant to this subdivision is immune from suit pursuant to Section 1566 in the same manner as if the state or local agency had filed a claim to the property. For purposes of this subdivision, “local agency” means a city, county, city and county, or district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 36, Sec. 26.   (AB 3364)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1541.

Any person aggrieved by a decision of the Controller or as to whose claim the Controller has failed to make a decision within 180 days after the filing of the claim, may commence an action, naming the Controller as a defendant, to establish his or her claim in the superior court in any county or city and county in which the Attorney General has an office. The action shall be brought within 90 days after the decision of the Controller or within 270 days from the filing of the claim if the Controller fails to make a decision. The summons and a copy of the
complaint shall be served upon the Controller and the Attorney General and the Controller shall have 60 days within which to respond by answer. The action shall be tried without a jury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 228, Sec. 9.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1542.

(a) At any time after property has been paid or delivered to the Controller under this chapter, another state is entitled to recover the property if:

(1) The property escheated to this state under subdivision (b) of Section 1510 because no address of the apparent owner of the property appeared on the records of the holder when the property was escheated under this chapter, the last known address of the apparent owner was in fact in that other state, and, under the laws of
that state, the property escheated to that state.

(2) The last known address of the apparent owner of the property appearing on the records of the holder is in that other state and, under the laws of that state, the property has escheated to that state.

(3) The property is the sum payable on a travelers check, money order, or other similar instrument that escheated to this state under Section 1511, the travelers check, money order, or other similar instrument was in fact purchased in that other state, and, under the laws of that state, the property escheated to that state.

(4) The property is funds held or owing by a life insurance corporation that escheated to this state by application of the presumption provided by subdivision (b) of Section 1515, the last known address of the person entitled to the funds was in
fact in that other state, and, under the laws of that state, the property escheated to that state.

(b) The claim of another state to recover escheated property under this section shall be presented in writing to the Controller, who shall consider the claim within 180 days after it is presented. The Controller may hold a hearing and receive evidence. The Controller shall allow the claim upon determination that the other state is entitled to the escheated property.

(c) Paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) do not apply to property described in paragraph (3) or (4) of that subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 228, Sec. 10.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1543.

Notwithstanding Section 1540, the Controller may do any of the following to streamline the secure payment of claims:

(a) Minimize the number of documents a claimant is required to submit for property valued at less than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(b) Allow electronic submission of documentation to the Controller’s internet website for any claim deemed appropriate by the Controller.

(c) Authorize direct deposit by electronic fund transfer for the payment of an approved claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 270, Sec. 1.   (AB 1208)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Administration of Unclaimed Property [1560. - 1568.]

1560.

(a) Upon the payment or delivery of escheated property to the Controller, the state shall assume custody and shall be responsible for the safekeeping of the property. Any person who pays or delivers escheated property to the Controller under this chapter and who, prior to escheat, if the person’s records contain an address for the apparent owner that the holder’s records do not disclose to be inaccurate, has made reasonable efforts to notify the owner by mail or, if the owner has consented to electronic notice, electronically, in substantial compliance with Sections 1513.5, 1514, 1516, and 1520, that the owner’s property, deposit, account, shares, or other interest will escheat to the state, is relieved of all liability to the extent of the value of the property so paid or delivered for any claim that then
 exists or that thereafter may arise or be made in respect to the property. Property removed from a safe-deposit box or other safekeeping repository shall be received by the Controller subject to any valid lien of the holder for rent and other charges, the rent and other charges to be paid out of the proceeds remaining after the Controller has deducted therefrom their selling cost.

(b) Any holder who has paid moneys to the Controller pursuant to this chapter may make payment to any person appearing to that holder to be entitled thereto, and upon filing proof of the payment and proof that the payee was entitled thereto, the Controller shall forthwith reimburse the holder for the payment without deduction of any fee or other charges. Where reimbursement is sought for a payment made on a negotiable instrument, including a traveler’s check or money order, the holder shall be reimbursed under this subdivision upon filing proof that the instrument was
 duly presented to them and that payment was made thereon to a person who appeared to the holder to be entitled to payment.

(c) The holder shall be reimbursed under this section even if they made the payment to a person whose claim against them was barred because of the expiration of any period of time as those described in Section 1570.

(d) Any holder who has delivered personal property, including a certificate of any interest in a business association, to the Controller pursuant to this chapter may reclaim the personal property if still in the possession of the Controller without payment of any fee or other charges upon filing proof that the owner thereof has claimed such personal property from the holder. The Controller may, in their discretion, accept an affidavit of the holder stating the facts that entitle the holder to reimbursement under this subdivision as sufficient proof
 for the purposes of this subdivision.

(e) Any holder who has delivered funds maintained under a preneed funeral trust or similar account or plan to the Controller pursuant to this chapter and has fulfilled the services of the preneed funeral trust escheated to the Controller shall be reimbursed under this section upon submission of a death certificate for the beneficiary and a statement detailing the personal property or funeral merchandise or services provided.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 8) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 514, Sec. 9.   (AB 293)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1561.

(a) If the holder pays or delivers escheated property to the State Controller in accordance with this chapter and thereafter any person claims the property from the holder or another state claims the property from the holder under that state’s laws relating to escheat, the State Controller shall, upon written notice of such claim, defend the holder against the claim and indemnify him against any liability on the claim.

(b) If any holder, because of mistake of law or fact, pays or delivers any property to the State Controller that has not escheated under this chapter and thereafter claims
the property from the State Controller, the State Controller shall, if he has not disposed of the property in accordance with this chapter, refund or redeliver the property to the holder without deduction for any fee or other charge.

(c) As used in this section, “escheated property” means property which this chapter provides escheats to this state, whether or not it is determined that another state had a superior right to escheat such property at the time it was paid or delivered to the State Controller or at some time thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 356.)
-------------------------------------------

1562.

When property other than money is delivered to the State Controller under this chapter, any dividends, interest or other increments realized or accruing on such property at or prior to liquidation or conversion thereof into money, shall upon receipt be credited to the owner’s account by the State Conroller. Except for amounts so credited the owner is not entitled to receive income or other increments on money or other property paid or delivered to the State Controller under this chapter. All interest received and other income derived from the investment of moneys deposited in the Unclaimed Property Fund under the provisions of this chapter shall, on order of the State
Controller, be transferred to the General Fund.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1514 by Stats. 1968, Ch. 356.)
-------------------------------------------

1563.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), all escheated property delivered to the Controller under this chapter shall be sold by the Controller to the highest bidder at public sale in whatever city in the state affords in the Controller’s judgment the most favorable market for the property involved, or the Controller may conduct the sale by electronic media, including, but not limited to, the internet, if in the Controller’s judgment it is cost effective to conduct the sale of the property involved in that manner. However, no sale shall be made pursuant to this subdivision until 18 months after the final date for filing the report required by Section 1530. The Controller may decline the highest bid and reoffer the property for sale if the Controller considers the price bid insufficient. The Controller need not offer any
 property for sale if, in the Controller’s opinion, the probable cost of sale exceeds the value of the property. Any sale of escheated property held under this section shall be preceded by a single publication of notice thereof, at least one week in advance of sale, in an English language newspaper of general circulation in the county where the property is to be sold.

(b) Securities listed on an established stock exchange shall be sold at the prevailing prices on that exchange. Other securities may be sold over the counter at prevailing prices or by any other method that the Controller may determine to be advisable. These securities shall be sold by the Controller no sooner than 18 months, but no later than 20 months, after the actual date of filing of the report required by Section 1530. If securities delivered to the Controller remain in the custody of the Controller, a person making a valid claim for those securities under this chapter shall
 be entitled to receive the securities from the Controller. If the securities or digital financial assets have been sold, the person shall be entitled to receive the net proceeds received by the Controller from its sale. United States government savings bonds and United States war bonds shall be presented to the United States for payment. Subdivision (a) does not apply to the property described in this subdivision.

(c) Digital financial assets held by the Controller may be converted to fiat currency at prevailing prices by any method that the Controller may determine to be advisable. The Controller shall convert such digital financial assets no sooner than 18 months, but no later than 20 months, after the actual date of filing of the report required by Section 1530. If digital financial assets delivered to the Controller remain in the custody of the Controller, a person making a valid claim for those assets under this chapter shall be entitled
 to receive the digital financial assets from the Controller. If the digital financial assets have been converted, the person shall be entitled to receive the net proceeds received by the Controller from its sale. 

(d) (1) All escheated property consisting of military awards, decorations, equipment, artifacts, memorabilia, documents, photographs, films, literature, and any other item relating to the military history of California and Californians that is delivered to the Controller is exempt from subdivision (a) and may, at the discretion of the Controller, be held in trust for the Controller at the California State Military Museum and Resource Center, or successor entity. All escheated property held in trust pursuant to this subdivision is subject to the applicable regulations of the United States Army governing Army museum activities as described in Section 179 of the Military and Veterans Code. A person claiming an
 interest in the escheated property may file a claim to the property pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 1540).

(2) The California State Military Museum and Resource Center, or successor entity, shall be responsible for the costs of storage and maintenance of escheated property delivered by the Controller under this subdivision.

(e) The purchaser at any sale conducted by the Controller pursuant to this chapter shall receive title to the property purchased, free from all claims of the owner or prior holder thereof and of all persons claiming through or under them. The Controller shall execute all documents necessary to complete the transfer of title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 660, Sec. 7.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1564.

(a) All money received under this chapter, including the proceeds from the sale of property under Section 1563, shall be deposited in the Unclaimed Property Fund in an account titled “Abandoned Property.”

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all money in the Abandoned Property Account in the Unclaimed Property Fund is hereby continuously appropriated to the Controller, without regard to fiscal years, for expenditure in accordance with law in carrying out
and enforcing the provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the following purposes:

(1) For payment of claims allowed by the Controller under the provisions of this chapter.

(2) For refund, to the person making such deposit, of amounts, including overpayments, deposited in error in such fund.

(3) For payment of the cost of appraisals incurred by the Controller covering property held in the name of an account in such fund.

(4) For payment of the cost incurred by the Controller for the purchase of lost instrument indemnity bonds, or for payment to the person entitled thereto, for any unpaid lawful charges or costs which arose from holding any specific property or any specific funds which were delivered or paid to the Controller, or which
arose from complying with this chapter with respect to such property or funds.

(5) For payment of amounts required to be paid by the state as trustee, bailee, or successor in interest to the preceding owner.

(6) For payment of costs incurred by the Controller for the repair, maintenance, and upkeep of property held in the name of an account in such fund.

(7) For payment of costs of official advertising in connection with the sale of property held in the name of an account in such fund.

(8) For transfer to the General Fund as provided in subdivision (c).

(9) For transfer to the Inheritance Tax Fund of the amount of any inheritance taxes determined to be due and payable to the state by any
claimant with respect to any property claimed by him or her under the provisions of this chapter.

(c) At the end of each month, or more often if he or she deems it advisable, the Controller shall transfer all money in the Abandoned Property Account in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to the General Fund. Before making this transfer, the Controller shall record the name and last known address of each person appearing from the holders’ report to be entitled to the escheated property and the name and last known address of each insured person or annuitant, and with respect to each policy or contract listed in the report of a life insurance corporation, its number, and the name of the corporation. The record shall be available for public inspection at all reasonable business hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 692, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1564.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any law, including, but not limited to, Section 1564, all money received under this chapter from funds held in an Interest on Lawyers’ Trust Account (IOLTA) that escheat to the state shall be administered as set forth in this section. The money shall be deposited into the Abandoned IOLTA Property Account, which is hereby established within the Unclaimed Property Fund.

(b) Twenty-five percent of the money in the Abandoned IOLTA Property Account shall be deposited into the IOLTA Claims Reserve Subaccount, which is hereby established within the Abandoned IOLTA Property Account. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, funds in the subaccount are continuously appropriated to the Controller for the payment of all refunds and claims pursuant to this chapter related to escheated IOLTA funds.

(c) The balance of the funds in the Abandoned IOLTA Property Account, excluding funds in the subaccount, shall be transferred on an annual basis to the Public Interest Attorney Loan Repayment Account established pursuant to Section 6032.5 of the Business and Professions Code. Before making this transfer, the Controller shall record the name and last known address of each person appearing from the holders’ report to be entitled to the escheated property.
The record shall be available for public inspection at all reasonable business hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 390, Sec. 1.   (AB 2350)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1565.

Any property delivered to the Controller pursuant to this chapter that has no apparent commercial value shall be retained by the Controller for a period of not less than seven years from the date the property is delivered to the Controller. If the Controller determines that any property delivered to him or her pursuant to this chapter has no apparent commercial value, he or she may at any time thereafter destroy or otherwise
dispose of the property, and in that event no action or proceeding shall be brought or maintained against the state or any officer thereof, or against the holder for, or on account of any action taken by, the Controller pursuant to this chapter with respect to the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 305, Sec. 8.   (SB 495)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1566.

(a) When payment or delivery of money or other property has been made to any claimant under the provisions of this chapter, no suit shall thereafter be maintained by any other claimant against the state or any officer or employee thereof for or on account of such property.

(b) Except as provided in Section 1541, no suit shall be maintained by any person against the state or any officer or employee thereof for or on account of any transaction entered into by the State Controller pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 356.)
-------------------------------------------

1567.

The Director of Parks and Recreation may examine any tangible personal property delivered to the Controller under this chapter for purposes of determining whether such property would be useful under the provisions of Section 512 of the Public Resources Code. If the director makes such a determination with respect to the property, the Controller may deliver the property to the director for use in carrying out the purposes of Section 512 of the Public Resources Code. Upon the termination of any such use, the director shall return the property to the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

1568.

(a) The Controller may select one or more custodians for the management and safekeeping of digital financial assets that have escheated to the state. Any entity selected as a custodian shall hold a valid license issued by the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 3201) of Division 1.25 of the Financial Code.

(b) If the Controller selects a custodian pursuant to subdivision (a), the Controller shall consider the following criteria in making the selection:

(1) Storage security to ensure the safekeeping of digital financial assets, including robust cybersecurity measures to prevent unauthorized access.

(2) Capability to manage private keys associated with digital financial assets and ensure the ability to transfer or transact with the assets when required.

(3) Proven experience in handling digital financial assets.

(4) Compliance with all applicable federal and state regulations related to digital financial asset custody.

(5) Regular reporting mechanisms to the Controller regarding the status and value of the digital financial assets in their custody.

(6) Processes to reunite owners with their digital financial assets, including maintaining updated contact records and issuing timely notifications.

(7) Qualifying as a
 “financial institution” under Chapter X of Title 31 of the Code of Federal Regulations, which subjects the qualified custodian to the anti-money laundering obligations of the federal Bank Secrecy Act (31 U.S.C. Sec. 5311 et seq.), in addition to any state-imposed anti-money laundering obligations.

(8) Any other factor that the Controller deems relevant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 660, Sec. 8.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Compliance and Enforcement [1570. - 1577.5.]

1570.

The expiration of any period of time specified by statute or court order, during which an action or proceeding may be commenced or enforced to obtain payment of a claim for money or recovery of property from the holder, does not prevent the money or property from being escheated, nor affect any duty to file a report required by this chapter or to pay or deliver escheated property to the State Controller.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1515 by Stats. 1968, Ch. 356.)
-------------------------------------------

1571.

(a) The Controller may at reasonable times and upon reasonable notice examine the records of any person if the Controller has reason to believe that the person is a holder who has failed to report property that should have been reported pursuant to this chapter.

(b) When requested by the Controller, the examination shall be conducted by any licensing or regulating agency otherwise empowered by the laws of this state to examine the records of the holder. For the purpose of determining compliance with this chapter, the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation is vested with full authority to examine the records of any banking organization and any savings association doing business within this state but not organized under the laws of or created in this
 state.

(c) Following a public hearing, the Controller shall adopt guidelines as to the policies and procedures governing the activity of third-party auditors who are hired by the Controller.

(d) Following a public hearing, the Controller shall adopt guidelines, on or before July 1, 1999, establishing forms, policies, and procedures to enable a person to dispute or appeal the results of any record examination conducted pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 42.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1572.

(a) The State Controller may bring an action in a court of appropriate jurisdiction, as specified in this section, for any of the following purposes: 

(1) To enforce the duty of any person under this chapter to permit the examination of the records of such person.

(2) For a judicial determination that particular property is subject to escheat by this state pursuant to this chapter.

(3) To enforce the delivery of any property to the State Controller as required
under this chapter.

(b) The State Controller may bring an action under this chapter in any court of this state of appropriate jurisdiction in any of the following cases:

(1) Where the holder is any person domiciled in this state, or is a government or governmental subdivision or agency of this state.

(2) Where the holder is any person engaged in or transacting business in this state, although not domiciled in this state.

(3) Where the property is tangible personal property and is held in this state.

(c) In any case where no court of this state can obtain jurisdiction over the holder, the State Controller may bring an action in any federal or state court with jurisdiction over the
holder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 356.)
-------------------------------------------

1573.

The State Controller may enter into an agreement to provide information needed to enable another state to determine unclaimed property it may be entitled to escheat if such other state or an official thereof agrees to provide this state with information needed to enable this state to determine unclaimed property it may be entitled to escheat. The State Controller may, by regulation, require the reporting of information needed to enable him to comply with agreements made pursuant to this section and may, by regulation, prescribe the form, including verification, of the information to be reported and the times for filing the reports.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 356.)
-------------------------------------------

1574.

At the request of another state, the Attorney General of this state may bring an action in the name of the other state, in any court of appropriate jurisdiction of this state or federal court within this state, to enforce the unclaimed property laws of the other state against a holder in this state of property subject to escheat by the other state, if:

(a) The courts of the other state cannot obtain jurisdiction over the holder; 

(b) The other state has agreed to bring actions in the name of this state at the request of the Attorney General of
this state to enforce the provisions of this chapter against any person in the other state believed by the State Controller to hold property subject to escheat under this chapter, where the courts of this state cannot obtain jurisdiction over such person; and

(c) The other state has agreed to pay reasonable costs incurred by the Attorney General in bringing the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 356.)
-------------------------------------------

1575.

(a) If the State Controller believes that a person in another state holds property subject to escheat under this chapter and the courts of this state cannot obtain jurisdiction over that person, the Attorney General of this state may request an officer of the other state to bring an action in the name of this state to enforce the provisions of this chapter against such person.

(b) This state shall pay all reasonable costs incurred by the other state in any action brought under the authority of this section. The State Controller may agree to pay to any state bringing such an action a
reward not to exceed fifteen percent of the value, after deducting reasonable costs, of any property recovered for this state as a direct or indirect result of such action. Any costs or rewards paid pursuant to this section shall be paid from the Abandoned Property Account in the Unclaimed Property Fund and shall not be deducted from the amount that is subject to be claimed by the owner in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 356.)
-------------------------------------------

1576.

(a) Any person who willfully fails to render any report or perform other duties, including use of the report format described in Section 1530, required under this chapter shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day such report is withheld or such duty is not performed, but not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) Any person who willfully refuses to pay or deliver escheated property to the Controller as required under this chapter shall be
punished by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(c) No person shall be considered to have willfully failed to report, pay, or deliver escheated property, or perform other duties unless he or she has failed to respond within a reasonable time after notification by certified mail by the Controller’s office of his or her failure to act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 762, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1577.

(a) In addition to any damages, penalties, or fines for which a person may be liable under other provisions of law, any person who fails to report, pay, or deliver unclaimed property within the time prescribed by this chapter, unless that failure is due to reasonable cause, shall pay to the Controller interest at the rate of 12 percent per annum on that property or value thereof from the date the property should have been reported, paid, or delivered.

(b) If a holder reports and pays or delivers unclaimed property within the time prescribed by this chapter, but files a report that is not in substantial compliance with the requirements of Section 1530 or 1532, the interest payable on the
 unclaimed property that is paid or delivered in the time prescribed by this chapter shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(c) The Controller may waive the interest payable under this section if the holder’s failure to file a report that is in substantial compliance with the requirements of Section 1530 or 1532 is due to reasonable cause.

(d) The Controller shall waive the interest payable under this section if the holder participates in and completes all of the requirements of the California Voluntary Compliance Program under Section 1577.5, subject to the right to reinstate, as specified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 282, Sec. 2.   (AB 2280)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1577.5.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the “California Voluntary Compliance Program.”

(b) The Controller may establish a program for the voluntary compliance of holders for the purpose of resolving unclaimed property that is due and owing to the state under this chapter.

(c) A holder that has not reported unclaimed property in accordance with Section 1530 may request to enroll in the program using a form prescribed by the Controller.

(d) The Controller, in their discretion, may enroll eligible holders in the program. A holder is
 ineligible to participate in the program if any of the following apply:

(1) At the time the holder’s request to enroll is received by the Controller, the holder is the subject of an examination of records or has received notification from the Controller of an impending examination under Section 1571.

(2) At the time the holder’s request to enroll is received by the Controller, the holder is the subject of a civil or criminal prosecution involving compliance with this chapter.

(3) The Controller has notified the holder of an interest assessment under Section 1577 within the previous five years, and the interest assessment remains unpaid at the time of the holder’s request to enroll.
 A holder subject to an outstanding interest assessment may file or refile a request to enroll in the program after resolving the outstanding interest assessment.

(4) The Controller has waived interest assessed against the holder under this section within the previous five years. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if a holder acquired or merged with another entity within the five-year period, the holder may request to enroll in the program for the purpose of resolving unclaimed property that may be due and owing to the state as a result of the acquisition or merger.

(e) The Controller shall waive interest
 assessed under Section 1577 for a holder enrolled in the program if the holder does all the following within the prescribed timeframes and satisfies the other requirements of this section:

(1) Enrolls and participates in an unclaimed property educational training program provided by the Controller within three months after the date on which the Controller notified the holder of their enrollment in the program, unless the Controller sets a different date.

(2) Reviews their books and records for unclaimed property for at least the previous 10 years, starting from June 30 or the fiscal yearend preceding the date on which the
 report required by paragraph (4) is due.

(3) Makes reasonable efforts to notify owners of reportable property by mail or electronically, as applicable, pursuant to Sections 1513.5, 1514, 1516, or 1520, no less than 30 days prior to submitting the report required by paragraph (4).

(4) Reports to the Controller as required by subdivisions (b), (c), and (e) of Section 1530 within six months after the date on which the Controller notified the holder of their enrollment in the program. Upon written request by the enrolled holder, the Controller may
 postpone the reporting date for a period not to exceed 18 months after the date on which the Controller notified the holder of their enrollment in the program.

(5) Submits to the Controller an updated report and pays or delivers to the Controller all escheated property specified in the report as required by Section 1532, no sooner than seven months and no later than seven months and 15 days after the Controller received the report submitted pursuant to paragraph (4).

(f) The Controller may reinstate interest waived under subdivision (d) of Section 1577 if the holder does not pay or deliver all escheated property specified in the report submitted pursuant to and within the timeframe prescribed by paragraph (5) of subdivision (e).

(g) The Controller may adopt guidelines and forms that provide specific procedures for the administration of the program.

(h) This section shall become operative only upon an appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act for this purpose.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 282, Sec. 4.   (AB 2280)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------


